New Jersey, session 221, S2031.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  For any student who is enrolled in a public school and receives any special education services in a group setting, the students individualized education program shall include the number of additional students in the same group and the number of teachers present during the provision of special education services in the group setting. b.    Each school district shall revise a students individualized education program to include the information required pursuant to subsection a. of this section during the next scheduled review of the students individualized education program following the date of enactment of this act and at each scheduled individualized education program review thereafter. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.